Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 1
COMMISSIONER AND BANKING BOARD

11-102-101. Division of banking - creation - subject to termination - repeal of article.

There is hereby created a division of banking within the department of regulatory agencies. The division shall be charged with functions provided by law. Whenever any law of this state refers to the banking department, said law shall be construed as referring to the division of banking.

The administrative head of the division shall be the commissioner of banking, who shall be the state bank commissioner appointed and serving as provided by law, and the deputies and employees of the commissioner shall also be deputies and employees of the division of banking hereby created. The bank commissioner, at the time of his or her appointment, shall be experienced in the theory and practice of the business and regulation of financial services institutions under the jurisdiction of the banking board.

The provisions of section 24-34-104, C.R.S., concerning the termination schedule for regulatory bodies of the state unless extended as provided in that section, are applicable to the division of banking created by this section.

This article is repealed, effective September 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1059, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(3)(b) amended, p. 322, § 1, effective April 7.

L. 2013:

(3)(b) amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1463, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-2-101 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-102-102. Powers of commissioner.

The commissioner shall be the administrative head of the division, shall set administrative policy therefor, and shall be responsible for the internal administration thereof, including personnel matters, records, reports, systems, and procedures.

The commissioner shall be the appointing authority for employees of the division under the state personnel system.

The commissioner shall be responsible for all examination and enforcement functions of the division of banking subject to the policy-making and rule-making authority of the banking board. In carrying out the responsibilities for examinations and enforcement, in addition to other powers conferred by this code and delegated by the banking board, the commissioner has the power to require a bank to:

Comply with the standards that the banking board may prescribe for determining the value of various types of assets;

Charge off the whole or any part of an asset that, at the time of the commissioner's action, could not lawfully be acquired;

Write down an asset to its market value;

File, record, or otherwise make effective liens and other interests in property;

Obtain a financial statement from a person with present or prospective liability to the bank to the extent that the bank can do so;

Obtain insurance against damage to real estate taken as security;

Obtain title insurance for real estate taken as security;

Maintain adequate insurance against such other risks as the commissioner or the banking board may determine to be necessary and appropriate for the protection of depositors and the public.

The commissioner shall have primary responsibility for the preparation of the preliminary budget draft for the division for review and comment by the banking board prior to its submission to the department of regulatory agencies.

The commissioner shall have the power to perform any acts and to make any decisions incidental to or necessary for carrying out any functions specified by this code or delegated by the banking board pursuant to this code.

The commissioner has the power, subject to the approval of the banking board and subject to the laws and state constitution, to appoint a chief deputy commissioner and such other deputy commissioners as shall be necessary to efficiently perform the duties of the commissioner. All such officers and employees shall receive such compensation for their services as shall be fixed under general provisions of law relating to the compensation of state officers and employees.

The commissioner, the deputies, and all other employees of the division shall, before entering upon the discharge of their duties, in addition to any oath required by the state constitution, take and subscribe an oath to keep secret all information acquired by them in the discharge of their duties, except as may be otherwise required by this code or by law. Willful violation of this oath is declared to be a criminal offense. The commissioner, all deputies, and all other employees of the division shall be subject to article 18 of title 24, C.R.S.

The commissioner may delegate to any officer or employee of the division any of the commissioner's powers and may designate any officer or employee of the division to perform any of the commissioner's duties.

The commissioner, and such other officers and employees handling money or securities in the course of their duties as the banking board may determine, shall be bonded in such amount as the banking board may fix. The cost thereof shall be charged as an expense of the division.

The commissioner, all deputies, and all the employees, except special deputies and assistants employed in liquidating failed banks, shall devote their entire time and attention to the duties of their several positions and shall not, during their terms of service, receive any salary or compensation whatsoever from any bank.

In the case of a vacancy in the office of the commissioner for any cause, and until such vacancy is filled, the chief deputy commissioner shall have and exercise all the powers and duties conferred by law or by the banking board upon the commissioner, with the same authority as if those powers and duties were exercised and performed by the commissioner. If there is no chief deputy at the time of such vacancy, a chief deputy shall be appointed.

The commissioner shall have a seal of office containing the words "Commissioner of Banking of Colorado" in the form of a circle and the word "seal" within the circle.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1060, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-2-106 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-102-103. Banking board - repeal.

There is established in the division a banking board, which consists of nine members appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, as follows:

Five members who during their tenure are, and must remain, executive officers of state banks, each of whom must have not less than five years' practical experience as an active executive officer of a bank. At least two of such members shall represent banks having less than one hundred fifty million dollars in total assets at the time of their appointment.

One member who during the member's tenure is, and must remain, an executive officer of a business licensed pursuant to article 110 of this title 11;

One member who during the member's tenure is, and must remain, the executive officer of a trust company; and

Two members who serve as public members of the banking board who have expertise in finance through their current experience in business, industry, agriculture, or education.

No member of the banking board shall have any interest, direct or indirect, in a bank in which another member of the banking board has any such interest. Not more than one of the members shall be an executive officer or employee of any one bank holding company or affiliate thereof.

Of the members appointed under subsection (1) of this section, at all times at least one must reside west of the continental divide.

The term of office of each member is four years. In the event of the death, resignation, inability to act, or refusal to act of any member of the banking board, or the occurrence of any other event that disqualifies the member from serving the remainder of the member's term on the banking board, the governor, within forty-five days thereafter, or, in the event of the governor's failure to act, the banking board shall make an interim appointment of a member to serve for the unexpired term on the banking board, subject to the consent of the senate. The governor may remove a member for cause. Any banking board member who is absent from three consecutive banking board meetings is subject to immediate removal by the governor.

Each member of the banking board shall receive the same per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses as those provided for members of boards and commissions in the division of professions and occupations pursuant to section 12-20-103 (6). Payment for all such expenses and allowances shall be made upon vouchers, which shall be filed with the department of personnel.

The banking board shall meet at least once in each calendar month. The chair of the banking board may call additional meetings of the banking board upon at least seventy-two hours' notice to all members of the banking board and shall do so upon the request of two members. All members of the banking board are subject to immediate call in the event of an emergency. Four members of the banking board constitutes a quorum, and action taken by a majority of those present at any meeting at which a quorum is present is the action of the banking board. Upon the affirmative vote of a majority of those present at any meeting at which a quorum is present, one or more members may be authorized to conduct any hearing required under this code. In the event that less than a quorum of the banking board is present during the conduct of the hearing, at least a quorum of the banking board shall read the entire record before voting thereon. No member shall participate in a proceeding before the banking board when any corporation, partnership, or unincorporated association of which the member is, or was at any time in the preceding twelve months, a director, officer, partner, employee, member, or stockholder is a party to such proceedings. A member may disqualify himself or herself from participating in a proceeding for any other cause deemed by the member to be sufficient.

A quorum may be established by means of remote participation, which must be recorded in the banking board's minutes. Upon the affirmative vote of a majority of those present at any meeting at which a quorum is present, the banking board may hold an executive session to consider certain matters required by statute to be kept confidential under this code. Any agenda and the minutes of executive sessions shall be kept confidential by the banking board.

The division shall provide such clerical, technical, and legal assistance as the banking board may require.

The members of the banking board shall, before entering upon the discharge of their duties, in addition to any oath required by the state constitution, take and subscribe an oath to keep secret all information acquired by them in the discharge of their duties, except as may be otherwise required by law. Willful violation of this oath shall be a criminal offense.

The banking board shall elect a chair from among its members to serve for a term not exceeding two years, as determined by the banking board. No chair is eligible to serve as such for more than two successive terms. In addition to the amounts received pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, the chair shall receive per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses in the amounts provided by section 12-20-103 (6) for each day spent in attending to the duties of the banking board.

The banking board may enter into contracts with temporary employees and for the provision of such other services as it may deem necessary in accordance with section 13 of article XII of the state constitution.

This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1062, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1)(a), (2)(a), and (4) amended and (13) added, p. 21, §§ 3, 1, effective March 3.

L. 2009:

(2)(b) amended, (HB 09-1053), ch. 159, p. 687, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2013:

(13) amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1463, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(2)(b) amended, (SB 17-226), ch. 159, p. 589, § 5, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(6) and (11) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1660, § 63, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 10, § 10, effective February 25.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-2-102 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-102-104. Powers and duties of banking board - fees - rules.

The banking board is the policy-making and rule-making authority for the division of banking and has the power to:

Make, modify, reverse, and vacate rules for the proper enforcement and administration of this code and the "Public Deposit Protection Act", article 10.5 of this title;

Make, promulgate, alter, amend, or revise reasonable rules as may be necessary for the enforcement and execution of the "Money Transmitters Act", article 110 of this title 11; and

Regulate procedure and practice of the banking board.

(1.5) The banking board is a

type 1

entity, as defined in section 24-1-105.

In addition to any other powers conferred on it by this code, the banking board has the power to:

Make all final decisions with respect to ownership including, but not limited to:

Chartering and conversions;

Mergers;

Acquisitions; and

Change of control;

Make all final decisions with respect to certification pursuant to section 11-104-202;

Make all final decisions with respect to the taking of possession, liquidation, or reorganization of banks and the emergency grant of new charters and branch facilities;

Make all final decisions with respect to requests to exercise trust, fiduciary, and agency powers.

The banking board has the power to prohibit the taking of deposits or to restrict the withdrawal of deposits, or both, from any one or more state banks when the banking board finds that extraordinary circumstances make such a restriction necessary for the proper protection of depositors in the affected state bank.

The banking board has the power to authorize state banks under circumstances in which state banks are not given authority under this code to act without the approval of the banking board; to participate in any public agency created after July 1, 1957, under the laws of this state or the United States, the purpose of which is to afford advantages or safeguards to banks or depositors; and to authorize compliance with all requirements and conditions imposed upon such participants.

The banking board has the power to authorize such banks to engage in any banking activity in which state banks could engage were they operating as national banks at the time such authority is granted, so long as such activity is not prohibited elsewhere in this code and to the extent permissible under rules of the banking board promulgated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section consistent with the policies set forth in section 11-101-102, or under any other provision of this code. State banks may engage in interstate branching to the same extent as if they were operating as national banks so long as such activity is in accordance with the rules of the banking board.

(5.5) (a) The banking board has the power to issue a state bank charter to a limited liability company, as that term is defined in section 7-80-102, C.R.S., so long as the limited liability company meets the requirements of this code. In the event of a conflict between the requirements of the provisions of this code and the "Colorado Limited Liability Company Act", article 80 of title 7, C.R.S., a state bank organized as a limited liability company shall be subject to the requirements of this code.

Repealed.

The banking board has the power to issue a trust company charter to a limited liability company, as that term is defined in section 7-80-102, C.R.S., so long as the limited liability company meets the requirements of article 109 of this title. In the event of a conflict between the requirements of article 109 of this title and the "Colorado Limited Liability Company Act", article 80 of title 7, C.R.S., a trust company organized as a limited liability company is subject to the requirements of article 109 of this title.

The banking board shall promulgate rules to effectuate the provisions of this subsection (5.5).

The banking board has the power to affirm, modify, reverse, vacate, or stay the enforcement of any order or ruling made by a hearing officer acting pursuant to section 11-102-201 or the commissioner acting pursuant to authority delegated by the banking board.

The banking board has the power to order any person to cease violating a provision of this code or a rule issued pursuant to this code or to cease engaging in any unsound banking practice, to impose civil money penalties pursuant to section 11-102-503, to suspend or remove a director or officer pursuant to section 11-102-505, and to take such other enforcement action as is authorized by sections 11-102-506 to 11-102-508 and any other provision of this code.

With respect to any action pursuant to subsection (3) or (7) of this section, ten days' notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, and the opportunity for a hearing shall be provided to the bank, the directors of the bank, and any person ordered to cease violating provisions of this code pursuant to subsection (7) of this section in advance of any action taken by the banking board. In cases found by the banking board to involve extraordinary circumstances requiring immediate action, the banking board may take such action without notice or hearing but shall promptly afford a subsequent opportunity for hearing upon application by the bank or directors of the bank to rescind the action taken. With respect to any authorization requested pursuant to subsection (4) or (5) of this section, the banking board may, on its own motion, or shall if requested by the applicant, hold a hearing on such request.

The banking board has the power to issue a declaratory order with respect to the applicability of this code or a rule issued by the banking board to any person, property, or state of facts under this code.

The banking board has the power to review and comment on the preliminary budget draft for the division prior to its submission to the department of regulatory agencies.

The banking board shall annually establish such fees and assessments and the percentages thereof as are necessary to generate the moneys appropriated by the general assembly for the division.

The banking board has the power to comment on who shall be the bank commissioner and to recommend the termination of the commissioner for cause. The banking board's comments and recommendations shall be given to the appropriate office or officer of the state having appointment or termination powers with regard to the commissioner.

The banking board has the power to perform any acts and make any decisions incidental to or necessary for carrying out its functions as set forth in this code.

The banking board shall not delegate to the commissioner any of its powers under subsections (1) to (12) of this section except informal enforcement powers arising under section 11-102-507, which powers shall be delegable pursuant to subsection (15) of this section.

Except as provided in subsection (14) of this section, the banking board may, in its discretion, delegate to the commissioner any of its powers, duties, and functions; except that all powers under this code vest in the banking board unless delegated to the commissioner by statute.

The banking board may, in its discretion, require the commissioner to report to the banking board periodically with respect to any powers delegated pursuant to subsection (15) of this section.

The banking board shall have a seal of office containing the words "Banking Board of Colorado" in the form of a circle and the word "seal" within the circle.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1064, § 3, effective July 1; (5.5) added, p. 1745, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(6) amended, p. 596, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(18) added, p. 1500, § 2, effective May 28.

L. 2009:

(6) amended, (HB 09-1053), ch. 159, p. 688, § 5, effective August 5.

L. 2013:

(1)(b) and (5.5)(c) amended and (5.5)(b) and (18) repealed, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1473, § 34, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(1)(b) amended, (SB 17-226), ch. 159, p. 589, § 6, effective August 9.

L. 2022:

(1.5) added, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3391, § 108, effective August 10.

11-102-105. Roles and authority of banking board and commissioner - rules - exercise of powers.

All rules of the commissioner lawfully adopted prior to April 15, 1988, shall continue to be effective until revised, amended, repealed, or nullified pursuant to law.

The banking board and the commissioner in the exercise of their powers pursuant to this code shall be guided by and shall act in a manner consistent with the policies of the state of Colorado with respect to state banks as set forth in section 11-101-102.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1066, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 11-2-103.5 and 11-2-107 as they existed prior to 2003.

11-102-106. Nontraditional mortgages - consumer protections - rules - incorporation of federal interagency guidance.

The banking board shall adopt rules governing the marketing of nontraditional mortgages by banking institutions. In adopting such rules, the board shall incorporate appropriate provisions of section 1098 of the federal "Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act", amending 12 U.S.C. sec. 2601 et seq., and applicable regulations.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1745, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1475, § 35, effective July 1.